District of Columbia statutes.
44-111.01

Insurance for Assisted Living Residences.

(a)

Each ALR shall carry insurance for at least the following:

(1)

Hazards (fire and extended coverage) in the amount of $500.00 per resident to protect belongings with a minimum of $2,000 of coverage per facility;

(2)

Premises, personal injury, and products liability at least in the following amounts:

(A)

For one to 2 beds, $100,000 per occurrence;

(B)

For 3 to 9 beds, $300,000 per occurrence; and

(C)

For 10 or more beds, $500,000 per occurrence; and

(3)

Incidental malpractice coverage specific to the duties required of an ALA manager or any staff member in the amount of at least $100,000.

(b)

If an ALR is not owned by the operator or manager, the operator or manager shall obtain proof of the owner’s premises liability coverage, such as a certificate of standard landlord coverage, or shall place the owner on the operator’s or manager’s policy as an additional named insured.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1101, 47 DCR 2647